District of Columbia statutes.
2-1411.04

Transfers.

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Human Rights and Local Business Development for the human rights functions set out in Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1989, effective November 1, 1989, are hereby transferred to the Office.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 205, 46 DCR 6373
For temporary (90-day) addition of subchapter IV, see notes following § 2-1411.01.